South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5666.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 95, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-95-70.  (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a nicotine delivery product may not be sold at retail in this State unless the manufacturer certifies that the product: (1) is manufactured in a facility located within the United States; and (2) is subject to inspection by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (B) Products manufactured in foreign adversarial countries, as defined by federal law or regulation, are prohibited from retail sale in this State. (C) The Department of Revenue shall require manufacturers and distributors to disclose: (1) the country of manufacture; (2) the location of final assembly; and (3) supply chain origin information as required by the department. (D) The Department of Revenue shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----